Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1238.02
Vessel signaled to stop; violation; penalty.

The operator of any vessel when signaled to stop either by hand signals or by the display of a rotating or flashing red or blue light or lights shall immediately bring such vessel to a stop or follow the directions given by any officer having the authority to enforce the State Boat Act. Violation of this section shall be a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 43.